Maine, session 132, LD1987.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Adjustment of salary schedules for fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27.
The salary schedules for the executive branch employees in bargaining units represented
by the American Federation of State, County and Municipal Employees, the Maine State
Troopers Association, the Maine State Law Enforcement Association, the Maine Service
Employees Association, the Fraternal Order of Police and any other certified bargaining
representative for an executive branch bargaining unit must be adjusted consistent with the
terms of any collective bargaining agreements ratified by December 31, 2025.
Sec. 2. Adjustment of salary schedules for fiscal year 2026-27. The salary
schedules for the executive branch employees in bargaining units represented by the
American Federation of State, County and Municipal Employees, the Maine State Troopers
Association, the Maine State Law Enforcement Association, the Maine Service Employees
Association, the Fraternal Order of Police and any other certified bargaining representative
for an executive branch bargaining unit must be adjusted consistent with the terms of any
agreements made between May 1, 2026 and December 31, 2026, including any collective
bargaining agreement achieved through the process outlined in the agreement for resolution
between the State of Maine and the Maine Service Employees Association, SEIU Local
1989 effective August 29, 2024, regarding the study of the classification system for the
executive branch of the State of Maine. This section does not apply to any successor
collective bargaining agreement with a term beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
Sec. 3. Costs associated with the $2,000 lump-sum payment made in
October 2024 per the agreement for resolution between the State of Maine and
the Maine Service Employees Association, SEIU Local 1989 effective August
29, 2024.
1. An amount not to exceed $9,132,794 in the Salary Plan program, General Fund
account in the Department of Administrative and Financial Services may be transferred, by
financial order upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the
Governor, to fund the $2,000 lump-sum payment made in October 2024 from non-General
Page 1 - 132LR2553(07)

Fund and non-Highway Fund accounts per the agreement for resolution between the State
of Maine and the Maine Service Employees Association, SEIU Local 1989 effective
August 29, 2024. Funds must be transferred to the Departments and Agencies - Statewide
program, General Fund account within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller may
authorize the transfer, in an amount not to exceed $9,132,794, of Personal Services
expenditures associated with the $2,000 lump-sum payment made in October 2024 per the
agreement for resolution between the State of Maine and the Maine Service Employees
Association, SEIU Local 1989 effective August 29, 2024 from any non-General Fund and
non-Highway Fund account to the Departments and Agencies - Statewide program,
General Fund account within the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
3. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller on or
before July 31, 2025 shall transfer the unobligated balance from the Departments and
Agencies - Statewide program, General Fund account to the Salary Plan program, General
Fund account within the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
Sec. 4. New, temporary and seasonal employees; similar and equitable
treatment. The Governor is authorized to grant similar and equitable treatment consistent
with this Act for employees in classifications included in bargaining units subject to
collective bargaining agreements described in section 7 of this Act who are excluded from
collective bargaining pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 26, section 979-A,
subsection 6, paragraph F.
Sec. 5. Confidential employees; similar and equitable treatment. The
Governor is authorized to grant similar and equitable treatment consistent with this Act for
confidential employees. For the purposes of this section, "confidential employees" means
those employees within the executive branch, including probationary employees, who are
in positions excluded from collective bargaining units pursuant to the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 26, section 979-A, subsection 6, paragraphs B, C, D, I and J.
Sec. 6. Employee salaries subject to Governor's adjustment or approval.
The Governor is authorized to grant similar and equitable treatment consistent with this
Act for those unclassified employees whose salaries are subject to the Governor's
adjustment or approval.
Sec. 7. Costs to General Fund and Highway Fund. Costs to the General Fund
and Highway Fund must be provided wholly or in part through a transfer of Personal
Services appropriations within and between departments and agencies from the Salary Plan
program, General Fund account in the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services in an amount up to the full amount the Salary Plan program, General Fund account
has accrued as of the date an agreement is reached with the respective bargaining agents to
implement the economic terms of the most recent collective bargaining agreements, as
specified in sections 1, 2 and 3 of this Act, entered into by the State and the American
Federation of State, County and Municipal Employees, the Maine State Troopers
Association, the Maine State Law Enforcement Association, the Maine Service Employees
Association, the Fraternal Order of Police and any other certified bargaining representative
for an executive branch bargaining unit to provide equitable treatment of employees
excluded from collective bargaining pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 26,
Page 2 - 132LR2553(07)

section 979-A, subsection 6, paragraph F and, notwithstanding Title 26, section 979-D,
subsection 1, paragraph E, subparagraph (3), to implement equitable adjustments for
confidential employees.
Sec. 8. Transfer of Personal Services appropriations between programs
and departments; General Fund. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title
5, section 1585 or any other provision of law to the contrary, available balances in the
General Fund for Personal Services in fiscal year 2025-26 and fiscal year 2026-27 may be
transferred by financial order between programs and departments within the General Fund
upon recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor to be used
for costs associated with collective bargaining agreements for state employees, as specified
in sections 1, 2 and 3 of this Act.
Sec. 9. Transfer from Salary Plan program and special account funding.
The Salary Plan program, General Fund account in the Department of Administrative and
Financial Services may be made available as needed in allotment by financial order upon
the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor to be used
for the implementation of the collective bargaining agreements for state employees, as
specified in sections 1, 2 and 3 of this Act, and for other economic items contained in this
Act in fiscal year 2025-26 and fiscal year 2026-27. Except as outlined in section 3 of this
Act, positions supported from sources of funding other than the General Fund and the
Highway Fund must be funded from those other sources.
Sec. 10. Transfer of Personal Services allocations between programs and
departments; Highway Fund. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5,
section 1585 or any other provision of law to the contrary, available balances in the
Highway Fund for Personal Services in fiscal year 2025-26 and fiscal year 2026-27 may
be transferred by financial order between programs and departments within the Highway
Fund upon recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor to
be used for costs associated with collective bargaining agreements for state employees, as
specified in sections 1, 2 and 3 of this Act.
Sec. 11. Authorization for reimbursement of costs associated with study of
classification system for executive branch. The Department of Administrative and
Financial Services may be reimbursed up to $1,000,000 from the Salary Plan program,
General Fund account in the Department of Administrative and Financial Services for
resources necessary to conduct a study of the classification system for the executive branch
of State Government, to be prepared and submitted by a consultant by December 31, 2025,
as outlined in the agreement for resolution between the State of Maine and the Maine
Service Employees Association, SEIU Local 1989 effective August 29, 2024.
Sec. 12. Authorization for reimbursement of costs associated with contract
resolution. The Department of Administrative and Financial Services may be reimbursed
from the Salary Plan program, General Fund account in the Department of Administrative
and Financial Services for the costs of contract resolution, administration and
implementation and other costs required by the process of collective bargaining and
negotiation procedures.
Sec. 13. Voluntary employee incentive programs.
Page 3 - 132LR2553(07)

1. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 903, subsections 1 and
2, the Commissioner of Administrative and Financial Services shall offer for use special
voluntary employee incentive programs for state employees, including a 50% workweek,
flexible position staffing and time off without pay. Employee participation in a voluntary
employee incentive program is subject to the approval of the employee's appointing
authority.
2. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 285, subsection 7 and
Title 5, section 903, the State shall continue to pay health and dental insurance benefits for
a state employee who applies and is approved to participate in a voluntary employee
incentive program under subsection 1 based upon the scheduled workweek in effect prior
to the employee's participation in the voluntary employee incentive program.
3. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, sections 903 and 18056 and
any other provision of law to the contrary, the life, accidental death and dismemberment,
supplemental and dependent insurance amounts for a state employee who applies and is
approved to participate in a voluntary employee incentive program under subsection 1 are
based upon the scheduled hours of the employee prior to the employee's participation in
the voluntary employee incentive program.
Page 4 - 132LR2553(07)